Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Special Education.
§ 22.1-214.4.
Certain duties of Department.

The Department shall:

Provide training and guidance documents to local school divisions on the development of individualized education programs (IEPs) for children with disabilities that incorporate specific examples of high-quality present level of performance descriptions, annual goals, and postsecondary transition sections.

Develop a required training module for each individual who participates in an IEP meeting that comprehensively addresses and explains in detail (i) each IEP team member’s respective role in the IEP meeting, (ii) the IEP development process, and (iii) components of effective IEPs. The training module shall be required for all IEP participants, with the exception of parents, prior to participating in an IEP meeting and at regular intervals thereafter.

Annually conduct structured reviews of a sample of IEPs from a sufficiently large sample of local school divisions to verify that the IEPs are in compliance with state and federal laws and regulations governing IEP content, and provide a summary report of the findings of such reviews and recommendations regarding any necessary corrective actions to the reviewed divisions’ superintendents, special education directors, school board chairs and vice-chairs, and local special education advisory committees. In reviewing local school divisions’ IEPs, the Department shall determine whether the special education and related services, supplementary aids and services, and program modifications that will be provided to enable students with disabilities to participate in nonacademic and extracurricular activities are sufficient, and include its findings and corrective actions in the summary reports it provides to the reviewed local school divisions’ superintendents, special education directors, and school board members. Nothing in this section shall be construed to (i) direct the Department to make determinations regarding whether a particular IEP provides a free appropriate public education to any individual student or (ii) authorize the Department to override a parent’s consent to proposed revisions to an individual student’s IEP. In determining corrective actions, the Department shall make recommendations to the relevant school division regarding, among other things, those individual IEPs for which the IEP team should convene to consider revisions necessary to incorporate content required by special education regulations. For those individual IEPs for which the Department recommends that the IEP team should convene to consider such revisions, the relevant school division shall notify the relevant parents or caregivers of the recommendations issued in the summary report of the structured review conducted pursuant to this subdivision.

Develop and maintain a statewide plan for improving (i) its ongoing oversight of local practices related to transition planning and services for children with disabilities and (ii) technical assistance and guidance provided for postsecondary transition planning and services for children with disabilities. At a minimum, such plan shall articulate how the Department will reliably and comprehensively assess the compliance and quality of transition plans for children with disabilities on an ongoing basis and communicate findings to local school division staff and local school boards. The Department shall, no later than December 1 of each year, update the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Education and Health and the House Committee on Education on its progress in implementing such plan.

Develop and maintain a statewide strategic plan for recruiting and retaining special education teachers. At a minimum, such plan shall (i) use data analyses to determine the specific staffing needs of each local school division on an ongoing basis; (ii) evaluate the potential effectiveness of strategies for addressing recruitment and retention challenges, including tuition assistance, differentiated pay for special education teachers, and the expansion of special education teacher mentorships; and (iii) estimate the costs of implementing each such strategy, including the extent to which federal funds could be used to support implementation. The Department shall, no later than November 1 of each year, update the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Education and Health and the House Committee on Education on its progress in implementing such plan.

In order to (i) address variation in rates of determinations of student eligibility for special education and related services both across local school divisions in the Commonwealth and based on specific student disabilities, (ii) promote consistency in such eligibility determinations, and (iii) ensure equal access to special education and related services across local school divisions, (a) update its special education eligibility worksheets as necessary, including clarifying any ambiguity or vagueness in eligibility criteria, and (b) provide to each local school division the appropriate level of guidance on eligibility determinations for special education and related services.

Develop criteria for what constitutes “exceptional circumstances” that warrant extension of the 60-calendar day regulatory timeline for complaint investigations and include the criteria in its publicly available complaint resolution procedures, (ii) consistently track the Department’s receipt of each sufficient complaint and its issuance of the respective letter of findings, and (iii) require staff to report at least quarterly to the Superintendent of Public Instruction on the specific reasons for granting an extension due to “exceptional circumstances” and the amount of time it took to complete each investigation beyond the 60-calendar day regulatory timeline

Develop policies and procedures for considering and addressing credible allegations of local education agency (LEA) noncompliance with the requirements of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (P.L. 101-476) that do not meet the current regulatory standard for state complaints. Such policies and procedures shall include expectations and mechanisms for collaboration between the Office of Dispute Resolution and Administrative Services and the Office of Special Education Program Improvement in the Division of Special Education and Student Services at the Department to investigate and resolve such credible allegations of noncompliance that do not qualify for state complaint investigations.

Elevate the position of parent ombudsman for special education to report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The parent ombudsman for special education shall systematically track and report questions and concerns raised by parents to the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The Department shall develop a one-page comprehensive summary of the roles and responsibilities of the parent ombudsman for special education, the specific supports the parent ombudsman for special education can provide to parents, and how to contact the parent ombudsman for special education. The Department shall make the summary available in multiple languages on its website.

Develop and implement a process for systematically auditing and verifying school divisions’ self-determinations of compliance with all Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (P.L. 101-476) performance indicators. The verification process shall include a random sample of school divisions each year and ensure that all school divisions’ self-determinations are reviewed and verified no less frequently than once every five years.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 173, 451, 452.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 173, cl. 1,
§ 1, was codified as subdivision 6 of § 22.1-214.4. Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 173, cl. 1,
§ 2 provides: “In order to (i) promote and improve the quality of individualized education programs (IEPs) for students with disabilities across the Commonwealth and (ii) ensure that each IEP contains key and required elements such as the student’s academic or functional needs and goals, the Board of Education shall amend its Regulations Governing the Review and Approval of Education Programs in Virginia (8VAC20-543-10 et seq.) to ensure that each education preparation program graduate in a K-12 general education endorsement area demonstrates proficiency in understanding the role of general education teachers on the IEP team.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cls. 7-10 were codified as subdivisions 7 through 10 of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Education shall (i) conduct a one-time targeted review of the transition sections of a random sample of students’ individualized education programs (IEPs) in each local school division; (ii) communicate its findings to each local school division, school board, and local special education advisory committee; and (iii) ensure that local school divisions correct any IEPs that are found to be out of compliance no later than the end of the 2021-2022 school year. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall submit a letter to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Education and Health and the House Committee on Education certifying that school divisions have corrected all instances of noncompliance identified pursuant to such review.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Education shall submit to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Education and Health and the House Committee on Education (i) the statewide plan developed pursuant to subdivision 4 of § 22.1-214.4 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, no later than December 1, 2022, and (ii) the statewide strategic plan developed pursuant to subdivision 5 of § 22.1-214.4 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, no later than November 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Education shall develop and implement a clear and comprehensive plan to improve its approach to monitoring Virginia’s special education system on an ongoing basis. The plan shall describe the Department of Education’s procedures for effectively determining whether school divisions are complying with state and federal requirements pertaining to (i) identification and eligibility determination processes, (ii) individualized education program development and implementation, (iii) post-secondary transition planning, (iv) inclusion in academic and non-academic experiences and the use of discipline, and (v) special education staffing. The plan shall propose actions to increase monitoring capacity and onsite visits with existing resources and by leveraging available federal funding. The Department of Education shall present its plan to the Senate Committee on Education and Health, the House Committee on Education, and the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission no later than November 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 12 provides: “That the Department of Education shall study the need for and feasibility of allowing parents to provide partial consent to the initial implementation of their child’s individualized education program (IEP), including an assessment of the use of partial parental consent in other states and by school divisions in the Commonwealth. The Department shall issue a report of its findings to the Board of Education and the House Committee on Education and Senate Committee on Education and Health by December 31, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 13 provides: “That the requirement that every person seeking renewal of a license as a teacher shall complete training in the instruction of students with disabilities that includes (i) differentiating instruction for students depending on their needs; (ii) understanding the role of general education teachers on the individualized education program team; (iii) implementing effective models of collaborative instruction, including co-teaching; and (iv) understanding the goals and benefits of inclusive education for all students, as set out in § 22.1-298.1 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by the act, shall have a delayed effective date of July 1, 2022.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 14 provides: “That the Board of Education shall amend its Regulations Governing Special Education Programs for Children with Disabilities in Virginia (8VAC20-81) to include a provision requiring that, if a school division develops a draft individualized education program (IEP) prior to a scheduled IEP meeting, it shall provide such draft IEP to the parents at least two business days in advance of such IEP meeting. Such requirement to provide such draft IEP to the parents at least two business days in advance of such IEP meeting shall become effective no later than the start of the 2022-2023 school year.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 15 provides: “That the requirement for all IEP participants, with the exception of parents, to participate in the training module developed by the Department of Education pursuant to subdivision 2 of § 22.1-214.4 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, prior to participating in an IEP meeting and at regular intervals thereafter shall become effective no later than the start of the 2022-2023 school year.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 22.1-215.
School divisions to provide special education; plan to be submitted to Board.

Each school division shall provide free and appropriate education, including special education, for (i) the children with disabilities residing within its jurisdiction and (ii) the children with disabilities who do not reside within its jurisdiction but reside in the Commonwealth and are enrolled in a full-time virtual school program provided by the school division, in accordance with regulations of the Board of Education. A school division that is required to provide a free and appropriate education, including special education, for a nonresident student who is enrolled in its full-time virtual school program pursuant to this section shall be entitled to any federal and state funds applicable to the education of such student. In the case of a student who is a resident of the Commonwealth but does not reside in the school division in which he is enrolled in a full-time virtual school program, the school division in which the student resides shall be released from the obligation to provide a free and appropriate education, including special education, for such student.

For the purposes of this section, “children with disabilities, residing within its jurisdiction” shall include: (a) those individuals of school age identified as appropriate to be placed in public school programs who are residing in a state facility operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services located within the school division, or (b) those individuals of school age who are Virginia residents and are placed and living in a foster care home or child-caring institution or group home located within the school division and licensed under the provisions of Chapter 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) of Title 63.2 as a result of being in the custody of a local department of social services or welfare or being privately placed, not solely for school purposes.

The Board of Education shall promulgate regulations to identify those children placed within facilities operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services who are eligible to be appropriately placed in public school programs.

The cost of the education provided to children residing in state facilities who are appropriate to place within the public schools shall remain the responsibility of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services. The cost of the education provided to children who are not residents of the Commonwealth and are placed and living in a foster care home or child-caring institution or group home located within the school division and licensed under the provisions of Chapter 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) of Title 63.2 shall be billed to the sending agency or person by the school division as provided in subsection C of § 22.1-5. No school division shall refuse to educate any such child or charge tuition to any such child.

Each school division shall submit to the Board of Education in accordance with the schedule and by the date specified by the Board, a plan acceptable to the Board for such education for the period following and a report indicating the extent to which the plan required by law for the preceding period has been implemented. However, the schedule specified by the Board shall not require plans to be submitted more often than annually unless changes to the plan are required by federal or state law or regulation.

Each local school division shall complete a self-assessment and action planning instrument addressing inclusion practices, as developed by the Department, once every three years and report the results of the assessment and plans for improvement to the Department, the division’s superintendent, the division’s special education director, and the chairs of the local school board and local special education advisory committee.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.5; 1974, c. 480; 1978, c. 386; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 158; 1988, c. 101; 1994, c. 854; 1996, cc. 583, 594; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2014, c. 433; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451, 452.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 433, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall modify its special education program regulations in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 16 provides: “That the requirement for each local school division to complete and report the results of a self-assessment and action planning instrument as set forth in § 22.1-215 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall become effective no later than the start of the 2022-2023 school year.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” throughout the section.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “state facility” for “state institution” in clause (i) of the first paragraph and “in state facilities” for “in the state institutions,” in the first sentence of the third paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 433 rewrote the first paragraph; and in the second paragraph substituted “(a)” for “(i)” and “(b)” for “(ii).”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added the last paragraph.

§ 22.1-215.1.
Information regarding procedures and rights relating to special education placement and withdrawal.

The Board shall publicize and disseminate to parents of students who are enrolled in special education programs or for whom a special education placement has been recommended information regarding current federal law and regulation addressing procedures and rights related to the placement and withdrawal of children in special education.

History.

2001, c. 439; 2022, c. 355.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cl. 2, provides: “That the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apprise local school boards of the provisions of this act by Superintendent’s Administrative Memorandum no later than 30 days after its enactment.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 substituted “The Board” for “Effective July 1, 2001, the Board of Education.”

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

§ 22.1-215.2.
Parental notification; literacy and Response to Intervention screening and services; certain assessment results.

Each local school board shall enact a policy to require that timely written notification is provided to the parents of any student who:

Undergoes literacy and Response to Intervention screening and services; or

Does not meet the benchmark on any assessment used to determine at-risk learners in preschool through grade 12, which notification shall include all such assessment scores and subscores and any intervention plan that results from such assessment scores or subscores.

History.

2020, c. 336.

§ 22.1-216.
Use of public or private facilities and personnel under contract for special education.

A school board may provide special education for children with disabilities either directly with its own facilities and personnel or under contract with another school division or divisions or any other public or private nonsectarian school, agency or institution licensed or certified by the Board of Education or by a licensing authority in the state where the facility is located. Special education for children below the compulsory school attendance age may be provided in nonsectarian child-day programs licensed in accordance with state law.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.6; 1974, c. 480; 1980, c. 559; 1994, cc. 376, 854; 1996, c. 133.

§ 22.1-217.
Visually impaired children.

Special education for visually impaired children provided by a school division shall be established, maintained and operated jointly by the school board and the Virginia Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired subject to the regulations of the Board of Education. Braille instruction shall be included in the student’s Individualized Education Plan (IEP), whenever appropriate. When developing the IEP for students with visual impairment, the presumption shall be that proficiency in literacy is essential for such student to achieve satisfactory educational progress. However, use of Braille shall not be required if other special education services are more appropriate to the student’s educational needs, and the provision of other appropriate services shall not preclude Braille instruction.

The Virginia Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired shall prepare and deliver a program of special education services in addition to the special education provided in the public school system designed to meet the educational needs of visually impaired children between the ages of birth and twenty-one and may prepare and deliver such programs for such individuals of other ages. In the development of such a program, the Virginia Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired shall cooperate with the Board of Education and the school boards of the several school divisions. The Virginia Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired shall assist the Board of Education and the school boards of the several school divisions with in-service training in Braille for currently employed teachers of students who are blind and visually impaired.

As used in this section:“Braille” means the system of reading and writing through touch and is commonly known as standard English Braille Grade 2.“Program” means a modified program which provides special materials or services and may include the employment of itinerant teachers or resource room teachers for the visually impaired.“Visually impaired” shall be defined by the Board of Education and the Virginia Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.7; 1974, c. 480; 1978, c. 386; 1980, c. 559; 1990, c. 803; 1992, c. 755; 1995, c. 750; 1998, c. 852.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 755, cl 5., as amended by Acts 1994, c. 666, cl. 1, which provided for the expiration of Acts 1992, c. 755, as it related to the Board and Department for the Visually Handicapped (effective January 1, 2001, the Board and Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired), on July 1, 1995, was repealed by Acts 1995, c. 392, cl. 2. Therefore, the 1992 amendment of this section by Acts 1992, c. 755, did not expire on July 1, 1995.

§ 22.1-217.01.
Information on educational and other services for students identified as deaf or hard of hearing or visually impaired.

The Department of Education shall annually prepare and distribute to local school boards packets of information describing the educational and other services available through the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind, the Virginia Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, and the Virginia Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired to students who are identified as deaf or hard of hearing or visually impaired. Local school boards shall annually post this information on the school division’s website and inform the parents of those students who are identified as deaf or hard of hearing or visually impaired of its availability. School boards shall ensure that packets of such information are available in an accessible format for review by parents who do not have Internet access.

History.

1998, c. 351; 2000, c. 285; 2011, c. 216; 2015, c. 55; 2019, c. 288.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 285 substituted “School” for “Schools,” and inserted “at Staunton, the Virginia School for the Deaf, Blind and Multi-Disabled at Hampton.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 216 deleted “at Staunton, the Virginia School for the Deaf, Blind and Multi-Disabled at Hampton” preceding “the Virginia Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 55, substituted “post this information on the school division’s website and inform” for “distribute this information to” and inserted “of its availability” in the second sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 288 substituted “deaf or hard of hearing” for “hearing impaired” twice.

§ 22.1-217.02.
Individualized education programs; children identified as deaf or hard-of-hearing.

In developing an individualized education program (IEP) for a child identified as deaf or hard-of-hearing, in addition to any other requirements established by the Board of Education, each local school division may ensure that IEP teams consider the child’s specific communication needs and address those needs as appropriate in the child’s IEP. In considering the child’s needs, the IEP team may expressly consider the following:

The child’s individual communication mode or language;

The availability to the child of a sufficient number of age, cognitive, academic, and language peers of similar abilities if the parents so desire;

The availability to the child of deaf or hard-of-hearing adult models of the child’s communication mode or language;

The provision of direct and ongoing language access to teachers of the deaf and hard-of-hearing, interpreters, psychologists, educational audiologists, speech-language pathologists, administrators, and other special education personnel who are knowledgeable due to specific training and who are proficient in the child’s primary communication mode or language;

The provision of communication-accessible academic instruction, school services, and direct access to all components of the educational process, including recess, lunch, extracurricular social and athletic activities, and the equal opportunity to participate in advanced coursework, technical vocational coursework, and academic classes as identified by the IEP team;

Equipping children identified as deaf or hard-of-hearing with appropriate assistive technology across a full spectrum; and

That the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind may be the least restrictive environment for the child.

No child identified as deaf or hard-of-hearing may be denied the opportunity for instruction in a particular communication mode or language solely because another communication mode or language was originally chosen for the child.

A child may receive instruction in more than one communication mode or language.

For the purposes of this section, “communication mode or language mode” means one or more of the following systems or methods of communication applicable to children identified as deaf or hard-of-hearing: (i) American Sign Language; (ii) English-based manual or sign systems; (iii) oral, aural, speech-based training; (iv) spoken and written English, including speech reading, lip reading, or cued speech; and (v) communication with assistive technology devices to facilitate language and learning.

History.

2013, cc. 704, 786.

§ 22.1-217.03.
Individualized education program teams to consider need for certain age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate instruction.

The Department of Education shall establish guidelines for individualized education program (IEP) teams to utilize when developing IEPs for children with disabilities to ensure that IEP teams consider the need for age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate instruction related to sexual health, self-restraint, self-protection, respect for personal privacy, and personal boundaries of others.

In developing IEPs for children with disabilities, in addition to any other requirements established by the Board, each local school board shall ensure that IEP teams consider the guidelines established by the Department of Education pursuant to subsection A.

History.

2020, cc. 51, 170.